Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 6. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 16.05.780.
Taking of antlerless moose prohibited.

The taking of antlerless moose in any game management unit or subunit or a portion of a unit or subunit is prohibited except that antlerless moose may be taken only under regulations adopted under (b) of this section after

the department recommends the season be opened in that year, based on biological evidence, and

a majority of active local advisory committees for that unit or subunit have recommended an opening for that year, after each has taken a vote and a majority of the members of those committees have voted in the affirmative.

Pursuant to (a) of this section the board, in its regularly scheduled annual game board meeting, may adopt regulations for the taking of antlerless moose in any game management unit or subunit in any year.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 1975)

Administrative Code. —

For seasons and bag limits, see 5 AAC 85, art. 2.

For areas of jurisdiction, see 5 AAC 98, art. 1.

Sec. 16.05.782.
Taking of brown or grizzly bear near solid waste disposal facility prohibited.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, a person who with criminal negligence takes a brown or grizzly bear within one-half mile of a solid waste disposal facility is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

In addition to the penalty imposed by law under (a) of this section, the court shall order forfeiture of the hide and skull of the bear, but if the hide and skull are not salvaged and delivered to the department then the court shall impose an additional fine of up to $10,000.

It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under (a) of this section that the person took the bear in defense of life or property if the person who took the bear shows by a preponderance of the evidence that

the necessity for the taking was not brought about by harassment or provocation of the bear by the person who took the bear;

the necessity for the taking was not brought about by the negligent disposal of garbage or the creation of a similar attractive nuisance by the person who took the bear; and

the person exhausted all other practicable means to protect life and property before the bear was taken.

Notwithstanding (a) — (c) of this section, the department may authorize the taking of a problem brown or grizzly bear within one-half mile of a solid waste disposal facility at any time, if the taking of the bear is necessary to protect the public and is consistent with sound game management principles.

In this section

“criminal negligence” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900(a)

;

“property” means

a dwelling, permanent or temporary;

an aircraft, boat, automobile, or other conveyance;

a domestic animal;

other property of substantial value necessary for the livelihood or survival of the owner;

“solid waste disposal facility” means a facility for the disposal of solid waste, other than sewage, for which a prior authorization has been issued under AS

46.03.100

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 136 SLA 2004)

Cross references. —

For penalties for class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035(b)(5)

and

12.55.135(a)

.

Sec. 16.05.783.
Same day airborne hunting.

A person may not shoot or assist in shooting a free-ranging wolf or wolverine the same day that a person has been airborne. However, the Board of Game may authorize a predator control program as part of a game management plan that involves airborne or same day airborne shooting if the board has determined based on information provided by the department

in regard to an identified big game prey population under AS

16.05.255(g)

that objectives set by the board for the population have not been achieved and that predation is an important cause for the failure to achieve the objectives set by the board, and that a reduction of predation can reasonably be expected to aid in the achievement of the objectives; or

that a disease or parasite of a predator population

is threatening the normal biological condition of the predator population; or

if left untreated, would spread to other populations.

This section does not apply to

a person who was airborne the same day if that person was airborne only on a regularly scheduled commercial flight; or

an employee of the department who, as part of a game management program, is authorized to shoot or to assist in shooting wolf, wolverine, fox, or lynx on the same day that the employee has been airborne.

A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $5,000, or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both. In addition, the court may order the aircraft and equipment used in or in aid of a violation of this section to be forfeited to the state.

When the Board of Game authorizes a predator control program that includes airborne or same day airborne shooting, the board shall have the prerogative to establish predator reduction objectives and limits, methods and means to be employed, who is authorized to participate in the program, and the conditions for participation of individuals in the program.

The use of state employees or state owned or chartered equipment, including helicopters, in a predator control program is prohibited without the approval of the commissioner.

In this section,

“free-ranging” means that the animal is wild and not caught in a trap or snare; and

“game management program” means a program authorized by the Board of Game or the commissioner to achieve identified game management objectives in a designated geographic area.

History.

(§ 1 1996 Ballot Measure No. 3; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 2 SSSLA 1999; am § 2 2000 Ballot Measure No. 6; am § 2 ch 20 SLA 2000; am §§ 1, 2 ch 124 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (f)(2) was enacted as (d)(3) and relettered as (d)(2) in 1999.
Subsections (d) and (e) were enacted as (e) and (f) and relettered in 2003, at which time subsection (d) was relettered as (f).

Administrative Code. —

For permits, see 5 AAC 92, art. 3.

For methods and means, see 5 AAC 92, art. 4.

For intensive management, see 5 AAC 92, art. 5.

Sec. 16.05.785.
Effect of failure to remove old markers.

If the Board of Fisheries by regulation uses department markers to establish waters closed to commercial fishing and the state fails to remove the old markers when new markers are posted to establish waters closed to commercial fishing, commercial fishing is expressly permitted in the waters between the new markers and the old markers until the old markers are removed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 70 SLA 1980)

Secs. 16.05.786,
16.05.787.
Duty of big game transporters to report violations; registration of big game hunting base camps, cabins, and lodges. [Repealed, § 18 ch 37 SLA 1989.]

Sec. 16.05.788.
Examination fee. [Repealed, § 24 ch 32 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 16.05.789.
Prohibition on hunting adjacent to highway between Yukon River and Arctic Ocean.

Hunting with firearms is prohibited north of the Yukon River in the area within five miles on either side of the highway between the Yukon River and the Arctic Ocean.

A person who violates this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 177 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

16.05.785

. Renumbered in 1980.

Cross references. —

For penalties for class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035(b)(5)

and

12.55.135(a)

.

Administrative Code. —

For seasons and bag limits, see 5 AAC 85, art. 2.

For restricted areas, see 5 AAC 92, art. 12.

Legislative history reports. —

On July 1, 1980, the attorney general advised the governor that the house and senate did not pass the same bill (SCS HB 207 am S (H. failed eff. date)), and the governor, acting on that advice, returned the bill to the house unsigned. For governor’s transmittal letter, see 1980 House Journal, p. 2240, and 1980 Senate Journal, p. 1781. Legislative counsel advised that under art. II, §§ 17 and 18, Constitution of Alaska, the bill became law without the governor’s signature, with an effective date of October 5, 1980. By judgment dated March 19, 1981, in Alaska Legislative Council v. Hammond, case no. 4FA-80-1689, the superior court for the fourth judicial district upheld the validity of the enactment of ch. 177, SLA 1980.

Sec. 16.05.790.
Obstruction or hindrance of lawful hunting, fishing, trapping, or viewing of fish or game.

Except as provided in (e) of this section, a person may not intentionally obstruct or hinder another person’s lawful hunting, fishing, trapping, or viewing of fish or game by

placing one’s self in a location in which human presence may alter the

behavior of the fish or game that another person is attempting to take or view; or

feasibility of taking or viewing fish or game by another person; or

creating a visual, aural, olfactory, or physical stimulus in order to alter the behavior of the fish or game that another person is attempting to take or view.

Notwithstanding AS 12.25, only a peace officer may arrest a person for violating this section. A peace officer who has probable cause to believe that a person has violated this section may arrest or cite the person or order the person to desist.

In a prosecution under this section, it is an affirmative defense that the person was lawfully entitled to obstruct or hinder the hunting, fishing, trapping, or viewing of fish or game.

This section does not apply to

lawful competitive practices among persons engaged in lawful hunting, fishing, or trapping;

actions taken on private property with the consent of the owner; or

the obstruction or hindrance of the viewing of fish or game by a person actively engaged in lawful fishing, hunting, or trapping.

A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not more than $500 or imprisonment for not more than 30 days, or both.

For purposes of (a) of this section, “lawful” means

in compliance with

this title, regulations adopted under this title, or applicable federal statutes and regulations;

the Marine Mammal Protection Act (P.L. 92-522) or the Endangered Species Act (P.L. 93-205); or

federal regulations adopted under 16 U.S.C. 3111 — 3126 relating to subsistence hunting, fishing, or trapping on federal land; and

with the permission of the private landowner if the hunting, fishing, trapping, or viewing of fish or game occurs on private land.

History.

(§ 1 ch 47 SLA 1991)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (f) was formerly subsection (b).
Relettered in 2012, at which time subsections (c) - (f) were relettered as (b) - (e), respectively.

Editor’s
notes. —

For the Marine Mammal Protection Act (P.L. 92-5222), see 16 U.S.C. § 1361 et seq.; for the Endangered Species Act (P.L. 93-205), see 16 U.S.C. § 1531 et seq.

Administrative Code. —

For methods and means, see 5 AAC 92, art. 4.

Sec. 16.05.791.
Civil remedies for violation of AS 16.05.790.

A person aggrieved by conduct or threatened conduct in violation of AS

16.05.790

may petition a superior court to enjoin the respondent from engaging in the conduct.

A person aggrieved by a violation of AS

16.05.790

is entitled to recover general damages and special damages, including license and permit fees, travel costs, guide-outfitting fees, costs for special equipment and supplies, and other related expenses.

A court may award punitive damages in addition to the damages set out in (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 47 SLA 1991)

Sec. 16.05.792.
Qualifications of Master Guides. [Repealed, § 2 ch 32 SLA 1968. For current law, see AS 08.54.]

Sec. 16.05.795.
License not required. [Repealed, § 2 ch 32 SLA 1968. For current law, see AS 08.54.]

Sec. 16.05.796.
Use of title. [Repealed, § 2 ch 32 SLA 1968. For current law, see AS 08.54.]

Sec. 16.05.797.
Computer-assisted remote hunting prohibited.

A person may not engage in computer-assisted remote hunting or provide or operate a facility for computer-assisted remote hunting in the state. This subsection applies to any person engaged in computer-assisted remote hunting if the game or any device, equipment, or software used for computer-assisted remote hunting is located in the state.

This section does not apply to a person with physical disabilities using equipment or devices designed to assist with the disability while present in the field and meaningfully participating in the act of hunting under regulations adopted by the Board of Game.

In this section,

“computer-assisted remote hunting” means the use of a computer or any other device, equipment, or software to remotely control the aiming and discharge of a firearm, bow and arrow, or any other weapon used to hunt any game bird, game animal, or fur-bearing animal while not in the physical presence of the animal;

“facility” means real property and improvements on the real property associated with computer-assisted remote hunting.

A person who violates (a) of this section is, upon conviction, guilty of a class A misdemeanor. If a violation is continuing in nature, each day the violation continues constitutes a separate offense.

History.

(§ 1 ch 33 SLA 2007)

Sec. 16.05.798.
Master guides. [Repealed, § 2 ch 32 SLA 1968. For current law, see AS 08.54.]

Sec. 16.05.800.
Public nuisances.

A net, seine, lantern, snare, device, contrivance, and material while in use, had and maintained for the purpose of catching, taking, killing, attracting, or decoying fish or game, contrary to law or regulation of a board or the commissioner, is a public nuisance and is subject to abatement.

History.

(§ 25 art I ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 5 ch 131 SLA 1960; am § 13 ch 206 SLA 1975)

Opinions of attorney general. —

Since there exists no statutory justification for destroying unmarked king crab pots pursuant to exercise of the power of summary abatement, such pots should not be destroyed without judicial approval. 1980 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 18.

Nuisance presented by unmarked king crab pots should be abated by instituting forfeiture proceedings rather than by summarily destroying the pots. 1980 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 18.

The abatement procedures described in AS

09.45.230

do not apply to the fish and game abatement law (this section). 1980 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 18.

Sec. 16.05.810.
Burden of proof.

The possession of fish or game or a part of fish or game, or a nest or egg of a bird during the time the taking of it is prohibited is prima facie evidence that it was taken, possessed, bought, or sold or transported in violation of this chapter.
The burden of proof is upon the possessor or claimant of it to overcome the presumption of illegal possession and to establish the fact that it was obtained and is possessed lawfully.
This section does not apply

during the first full 10 days after the time when a taking is prohibited, except as provided in (3) of this section;

if the fish or game or part of fish or game is in a preserved condition whether frozen, smoked, canned, salted, pickled, or otherwise preserved; or

with respect to crab aboard a commercial crab fishing vessel, during the first full three days after the time when a taking is prohibited.

History.

(§ 26 art I ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 42 SLA 1974)

Sec. 16.05.815.
Confidential nature of certain reports and records.

Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this section, records required by regulations of the department concerning the landings of fish, shellfish, or fishery products, and annual statistical reports of fishermen, buyers, and processors required by regulation of the department are confidential and may not be released by the department or by the Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission except as set out in this subsection. The department may release the records and reports set out in this subsection to the Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission. The department and the Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission may release the records and reports set out in this subsection to the recipients identified in this subsection if the recipient, other than a recipient under (6) — (10) of this subsection, agrees to maintain the confidentiality of the records and reports. The department and the Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission may release

any of the records and reports to the National Marine Fisheries Service and the professional staff of the North Pacific Fishery Management Council as required for preparation and implementation of the fishery management plans of the North Pacific Fishery Management Council within the exclusive economic zone;

any of the records and reports to the professional staff of the Pacific States Marine Fisheries Commission who are employed in the Alaska Fisheries Information Network project for the purpose of exchanging information with users authorized by the department;

any of the records and reports to the Department of Revenue to assist the department in carrying out its statutory responsibilities;

records or reports of the total value purchased by each buyer to a municipality that levies and collects a tax on fish, shellfish, or fishery products if the municipality requires records of the landings of fish, shellfish, or fishery products to be submitted to it for purposes of verification of taxes payable;

records or reports of guided sport fishing activities filed by a guide to a municipality that levies a tax on those activities if the

municipality requests the records for the purpose of verifying taxes payable; and

activities occurred within the four calendar years preceding the date of the request;

such records and reports as necessary to be in conformity with a court order;

on request, the report of a person to the person whose fishing activity is the subject of the report, or to a designee of the person whose fishing activity is the subject of the report;

on request, annual statistical reports of a fisherman, buyer, or processor to the fisherman, buyer, or processor whose activity is the subject of the report, or to a designee of the fisherman, buyer, or processor whose activity is the subject of the report;

any of the records and reports to the Department of Public Safety for law enforcement purposes;

fish tickets, fish ticket information, records required of sport fishing guides, and annual statistical reports of fishermen, buyers, and processors and information in those reports to the law enforcement personnel of the National Marine Fisheries Service and the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration for the purpose of enforcing fishery laws in waters of this state and in waters of the exclusive economic zone adjacent to this state;

fish tickets, fish ticket information, and records required of sport fishing guides regarding halibut to the International Pacific Halibut Commission;

any of the records and reports to the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

, or the child support enforcement agency of another state, for child support purposes authorized under law;

any of the records and reports to the Department of Natural Resources to assist the department in carrying out its statutory responsibilities in regard to sport fishing operations and sport fishing guides within the Kenai River Special Management Area under AS

41.21.500

—

41.21.514

; and

fish ticket information and records or reports of the total value purchased by each fisherman, buyer, or processor to the National Marine Fisheries Service for the purpose of enforcing the industry fee system of a fishing capacity reduction program under 16 U.S.C. 1861a (Magnuson-Stevens Fishery Conservation and Management Act).

Except as provided in (c) of this section, records or reports received by the department which do not identify individual fishermen, buyers, or processors or the specific locations where fish have been taken are public information.

Crab stock abundance survey information that reveals crab catch by sampling location is confidential and is not subject to inspection or copying under AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.120

until the close of the fishing season for which the survey was conducted.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the department shall keep confidential (1) personal information contained in fish and wildlife harvest and usage data; and (2) the records of the department that concern (A) telemetry radio frequencies of monitored species; (B) denning sites; (C) nest locations of raptors that require special attention; (D) the specific location of animal capture sites used for wildlife research or management; and (E) the specific location of fish and wildlife species. The department may release records and information that are kept confidential under this subsection if the release is necessary to comply with a court order, if the requester is a state or federal agency, if the requester is under contract with the state or federal agency to conduct research on a fish or wildlife population, or if the requester has been authorized by the department to perform specific activities and agrees to use the records and information only for purposes as provided under a contract or agreement with the department. After 25 years, the records and information that are kept confidential under this subsection become public records subject to inspection and copying under AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.140

unless the department determines that the release of the records or information may be detrimental to the fish or wildlife population. In this subsection, “personal information” has the meaning given in AS

40.25.350

.

The department may charge a municipality a fee, set by the department under AS

37.10.050

, to provide a record under (a)(5) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 117 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 117 SLA 1974; am § 1 ch 66 SLA 1980; am §§ 1, 2 ch 72 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 84 SLA 1985; am §§ 1, 2 ch 115 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 32 SLA 1989; am § 10 ch 200 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 89 SLA 1994; am § 19 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 59 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 119 SLA 2002; am § 5 ch 70 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 41 SLA 2007; am § 1 ch 74 SLA 2010; am §§ 3, 4 ch 77 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, in subsection (c), “AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.120

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.120” and in subsection (d) “AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.140

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.140

” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.140

.

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency created in AS

25.27.010

” was changed to “child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

” in paragraph (a)(11) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

In 2007, “AS

40.25.350

” was substituted for “AS 44.99.350” in subsection (d) to reflect the 2004 renumbering of AS 44.99.350.

Cross references. —

For exceptions to this section, see AS 16.43.520(i); for reporting of wholesale canned salmon prices, see AS

43.80.050

—

43.80.100

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 8, 2018, in (a), substituted “under (6) – (10)” for “under (5) – (9)” following “other than a recipient” in the third sentence, added (a)(5), and made related changes; added (e).

Sec. 16.05.820.
Research by the federal government.

The Secretary of the Interior, the Secretary of Commerce, or the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States and their authorized agents or other appropriate federal agencies may conduct fish cultural operations and scientific investigations in the state in the manner and at the times jointly considered necessary or proper by the Board of Fisheries and the secretary and their authorized agents.

History.

(§ 29 art I ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 14 ch 206 SLA 1975; am § 10 ch 208 SLA 1975)

Sec. 16.05.822.
Transplanting of musk oxen.

The board may transplant surplus musk oxen from Nunivak Island to appropriate areas on the mainland of the state, when good management practices dictate the action.
The board shall determine which transplant sites are appropriate and whether a surplus of animals exists.

History.

(§ 1 ch 220 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS

16.05.865

.
Renumbered in 2008.

Sec. 16.05.825.
State upland game bird release program.

In addition to any other program for the stocking or propagation of game birds that the department has as of July 23, 1974, the department shall establish a special program for the raising, maintenance, and release of upland game birds in the state. Birds raised under this program may be released in an appropriate area of the state at any time, but may be harvested only during regular hunting seasons, as specified by the board under AS

16.05.255(a)(2)

. The board shall adopt regulations necessary to implement this section.

The department shall establish an appropriate facility for the raising and maintenance of upland game birds to be located at an appropriate place, as determined by the commissioner, in interior Alaska.

The department shall employ a method of tagging game birds released under this section and compile harvest statistics.

In this section, “upland game bird” means a game bird for which a season is established under AS

16.05.255(a)(2)

as of July 23, 1974, excluding waterfowl.

History.

(§ 1 ch 31 SLA 1974; am § 15 ch 206 SLA 1975; am § 7 ch 126 SLA 1994)

Sec. 16.05.826.
Waterfowl conservation stamp program.

The waterfowl conservation tag authorized in AS

16.05.340(a)(17)

shall be produced annually in stamp form by the department in an amount the commissioner considers appropriate. The department shall make stamps available for the creation of waterfowl conservation limited edition prints and shall provide for the sale of stamps and prints to the public.

The department shall provide by appropriate means for the selection of the design of the annual waterfowl conservation stamp and for the production and sale of the stamps.

The department may contract to others the performance of the department’s responsibilities under this section. Contracting under this subsection is governed by AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code), except that a contract may include provisions for advance payment or reimbursement for services performed under the contract. All costs incurred under this section may be paid from the fish and game fund.

[Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]

History.

(§ 5 ch 71 SLA 1984; am § 8 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 31 ch 138 SLA 1986; am E.O. No. 73 § 12 (1989); am § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991)

Cross references. —

For legislative intent as to appropriation of stamp and print sale proceeds, see § 6, ch. 71, SLA 1984 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Legislative history reports. —

For legislative letter of intent as to contracts for production, distribution, and sale of limited edition prints, see 1984 House Journal at p. 3421.

Sec. 16.05.827.
Sale of subsistence salmon roe. [Repealed, § 4 ch 99 SLA 1975.]

Sec. 16.05.830.
Wanton waste. [Repealed, § 1 ch 73 SLA 1968.]

Sec. 16.05.831.
Waste of salmon.

A person may not waste salmon intentionally, knowingly, or with reckless disregard for the consequences. In this section, “waste” means the failure to utilize the majority of the carcass, excluding viscera and sex parts, of a salmon intended for

sale to a commercial buyer or processor;

consumption by humans or domesticated animals; or

scientific, educational, or display purposes.

The commissioner, upon request, may authorize other uses of salmon that would be consistent with maximum and wise use of the resource.

A person who violates this section or a regulation adopted under it is punishable by a fine of not more than $10,000, or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by both. In addition, a person who violates this section is subject to a civil action by the state for the cost of replacing the salmon wasted.

History.

(§ 3 ch 99 SLA 1975; am § 18 ch 132 SLA 1984)

Revisor’s notes. —

This section was enacted in section 3 of both ch. 89 and ch. 99, SLA 1975.
Chapter 99 had an immediate effective date (May 30, 1975), so the section was already in effect when ch. 89, enacting identical language, took effect on August 20, 1975.

Administrative Code. —

For salmon use, see 5 AAC 93, art. 3.

Sec. 16.05.835.
Maximum length of salmon seine and certain hair crab vessels.

Unless the Board of Fisheries has provided by regulation for the use of a longer vessel in a salmon seine fishery, a salmon seine vessel may not be longer than 58 feet overall length except vessels that have fished for salmon with seines in waters of the state before January 1, 1962, as 50-foot, official Coast Guard register length vessels.

A vessel engaged in the Bering Sea hair crab fishery within five miles of the shore may not be longer than 58 feet overall length.

In this section, “overall length” means the straight line length between the extremities of the vessel excluding anchor rollers.

History.

(§ 1 ch 252 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 24 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 126 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 145 SLA 2004; am § 26 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and intent relating to the amendment of this section by ch. 126, SLA 1996, see § 1, ch. 126, SLA 1996 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 16.05.840.
Fishway required. [Repealed, E.O. No. 107, § 44 (2003).]